Hawaii statutes.
§261-34 Not treated as income. No
payment received under sections 261-32 and 261-33 shall be considered as income
for purposes of the state income tax law; nor shall such payments be considered
as income to any recipient of public assistance, and such payment shall not be
deducted from the amount of aid to which the recipient would otherwise be
entitled to under the state welfare programs. [L 1970, c 165, pt of §2; am L
1986, c 339, §26]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next